Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
When a child support order is entered or modified, unless otherwise ordered by the court, the parties shall exchange information relevant to child support calculations on changes that have occurred since the previous child support order, and other appropriate information once a year or less often, for the purpose of updating and modifying the order without a court hearing. The parties shall use the approved standardized child support forms specified in subsection (4) of this section in exchanging financial information. The parents shall include the forms with any agreed modification or an agreement that a modification is not appropriate at the time. If the agreed amount departs from the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations, the parties shall furnish statements of explanation with the forms and shall file the documents with the court. The court shall review the agreement pursuant to this paragraph (a) and inform the parties by regular mail whether or not additional or corrected information is needed, or that the modification is granted, or that the modification is denied. If the parties cannot agree, a modification pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall not be entered; however, either party may move for or the court may schedule, upon its own motion, a modification hearing.

Upon request of the noncustodial parent, the court may order the custodial parent to submit an annual update of financial information using the approved standardized child support forms, as specified in subsection (4) of this section, including information on the actual expenses relating to the children of the marriage for whom support has been ordered. The court shall not order the custodial parent to update the financial information pursuant to this paragraph (b) in circumstances where the noncustodial parent has failed to exercise parenting time rights or when child support payments are in arrears or where there is documented evidence of domestic violence, child abuse, or a violation of a protection order on the part of the noncustodial parent. The court may order the noncustodial parent to pay the costs involved in preparing an update to the financial information. If the noncustodial parent claims, based upon the information in the updated form, that the custodial parent is not spending the child support for the benefit of the children, the court may refer the parties to a mediator to resolve the differences. If there are costs for such mediation, the court shall order that the party requesting the mediation pay such costs.

Postsecondary education.

This subsection (15) shall apply to all child support obligations established or modified as a part of any proceeding, including but not limited to articles 5, 6, and 10 of this title and articles 4 and 6 of title 19, C.R.S., prior to July 1, 1997. This subsection (15) shall not apply to child support orders established on or after July 1, 1997, which shall be governed by paragraph (a) of subsection (13) of this section.

For child support orders entered prior to July 1, 1997, unless a court finds that a child is otherwise emancipated, emancipation occurs and child support terminates without either party filing a motion when the last or only child attains nineteen years of age unless one or more of the following conditions exist:

The parties agree otherwise in a written stipulation after July 1, 1991;

If the child is mentally or physically disabled, the court or the delegate child support enforcement unit may order child support, including payments for medical expenses or insurance or both, to continue beyond the age of nineteen;

If the child is still in high school or an equivalent program, support continues until the end of the month following graduation, unless there is an order for postsecondary education, in which case support continues through postsecondary education as provided in this subsection (15). A child who ceases to attend high school prior to graduation and later reenrolls is entitled to support upon reenrollment and until the end of the month following graduation, but not beyond age twenty-one.

If the child marries, the child shall be considered emancipated as of the date of the marriage. If the marriage is annulled, dissolved, or declared invalid, child support may be reinstated.

If the child enters into active military duty, the child shall be considered emancipated.

If the court finds that it is appropriate for the parents to contribute to the costs of a program of postsecondary education, then the court shall terminate child support and enter an order requiring both parents to contribute a sum determined to be reasonable for the education expenses of the child, taking into account the resources of each parent and the child. In determining the amount of each parent's contribution to the costs of a program of postsecondary education for a child, the court shall be limited to an amount not to exceed the amount listed under the schedule of basic child support obligations in paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of this section for the number of children receiving postsecondary education. If such an order is entered, the parents shall contribute to the total sum determined by the court in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes as defined in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section. The amount of contribution that each parent is ordered to pay pursuant to this subsection (15) shall be subtracted from the amount of each parent's gross income, respectively, prior to calculating the basic child support obligation for any remaining children pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

In no case shall the court issue orders providing for both child support and postsecondary education to be paid for the same time period for the same child regardless of the age of the child.

Either parent or the child may move for an order at any time before the child attains the age of twenty-one years. The order for postsecondary education support may not extend beyond the earlier of the child's twenty-first birthday or the completion of an undergraduate degree.

Either a child seeking an order for postsecondary education expenses or on whose behalf postsecondary education expenses are sought, or the parent from whom the payment of postsecondary education expenses are sought, may request that the court order the child and the parent to seek mediation prior to a hearing on the issue of postsecondary education expenses. Mediation services shall be provided in accordance with section 13-22-305, C.R.S. The court may order the parties to seek mediation if the court finds that mediation is appropriate.

The court may order the support paid directly to the educational institution, to the child, or in such other fashion as is appropriate to support the education of the child.

A child shall not be considered emancipated solely by reason of living away from home while in postsecondary education. If the child resides in the home of one parent while attending school or during periods of time in excess of thirty days when school is not in session, the court may order payments from one parent to the other for room and board until the child attains the age of nineteen.

If the court orders support pursuant to this subsection (15), the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may also order that the parents provide health insurance for the child or pay medical expenses of the child or both for the duration of the order. The order shall provide that these expenses be paid in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes as defined in subsection (3) of this section. The court or delegate child support enforcement unit shall order a parent to provide health insurance if the child is eligible for coverage as a dependent on that parent's insurance policy or if health insurance coverage for the child is available at reasonable cost.

An order for postsecondary education expenses entered between July 1, 1991, and July 1, 1997, may be modified pursuant to this subsection (15) to provide for postsecondary education expenses subject to the statutory provisions for determining the amount of a parent's contribution to the costs of postsecondary education, the limitations on the amount of a parent's contribution, and the changes to the definition of postsecondary education consistent with this section as it existed on July 1, 1994. An order for child support entered prior to July 1, 1997, that does not provide for postsecondary education expenses shall not be modified pursuant to this subsection (15).

Postsecondary education support may be established or modified in the same manner as child support under this article.

Child support commission.

The child support guidelines, including the schedule of basic child support obligations, and general child support issues must be reviewed at least once every four years by a child support commission, which commission is hereby created. After the periodic review described in this section, the commission shall submit a report to the governor and to the general assembly explaining the commission's recommendations.

As part of its review, the commission must consider economic data on the cost of raising children and analyze case data on the application of, and deviations from, the guidelines and the schedule of basic child support obligations to be used in the commission's review to ensure that deviations from the guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations are limited.

The child support commission consists of no more than twenty-one members.

The governor shall appoint up to nineteen persons to the commission, who must include:

Representatives of the judiciary and the Colorado bar association;

The director of the division in the state department of human services who is responsible for child support enforcement, or the director's designee;

A director of a county department of human or social services;

The child support liaison to the judicial department;

Interested parties;

A certified public accountant; and

Parent representatives.

In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall attempt to assure geographical diversity.

The remaining two members of the commission are a member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and a member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate and must not be members of the same political party.

Members of the child support commission shall not be compensated for their services on the commission except as otherwise provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S., and except that members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses for travel and mileage incurred in connection with their duties. The child support commission is authorized, subject to appropriation, to incur expenses related to its work, including the costs associated with public hearings, printing, travel, and research.

and (e) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Click to view table

Click to view table

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 527, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-15.

L. 85:

(2) added, p. 592, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) to (16) added, p. 718, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 87:

(3)(b), (5), IP(7)(a), (10)(a), (11), and (12) amended, (7)(b)(II), (15), and (16) repealed, (7)(d), (7)(e), (10)(c), and (17) added, and (8), (9), (13), and (14) R&RE, pp. 587, 588, 600, 591, 589, §§ 5, 7, 38, 9, 6, 8, effective July 10.

L. 89:

(7)(d.5) added and (17) amended, p. 792, §§ 14, 15, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(18) added, p. 890, § 10, effective June 7; (7)(a)(I)(A), (7)(c), and (13)(a)(III) amended and (7)(b)(III) added, pp. 564, 890, 889, §§ 35, 10, 9, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(18)(a) amended, p. 359, § 21, effective April 9; (1.5) added and (7)(b), (13), (14)(b), and (18) amended, p. 234, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(17) amended, p. 2171, § 18, effective June 2; (1.5)(b)(I), (2), (3)(a), (3)(b), (7)(a), (7)(e), (8), (10)(a)(II), (10)(c), (14)(c)(I), (18), and (18)(a) amended, (1.5)(d), (13.5), (14.5), and (16.5) added, (7)(e) repealed, and (10)(b) R&RE, pp. 166, 203, 188, 169, 198, 193, §§ 1, 9, 2, 3, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(1.5)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(III) amended and (1.5)(e) added, pp. 1556, 577, §§ 1, 7, effective July 1; (1.5)(b)(I), (2), and (10)(c) amended and (3.5) and (18)(e) added, pp. 1559, 1560, §§ 7, 8, effective September 1.

L. 94:

(1.5)(b)(I), (1.5)(e), (7)(a)(I)(A), (7)(b)(III), (7)(d.5)(I), and (18)(e) amended, p. 1536, § 5, effective July 1; (18)(a) amended, p. 2645, § 107, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(1), (2), (3)(a), (3)(b)(II), (7)(a)(I)(A), (7)(a)(I)(C), (7)(b)(I), (10)(a)(II), (11)(a), (12), (13.5), and (16.5) amended, p. 594, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1.5) amended and (1.6) and (1.7) added, p. 565, § 20, effective July 1; (1.5), (3.5), (7)(b), and (18)(a) amended and (1.6) and (1.7) added, pp. 1264, 1312, §§ 8, 49, effective July 1; (5) and (17) amended, p. 561, § 5, effective July 1; (7)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 1240, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(a), (7)(d.5)(I), and (13)(a)(II) amended, p. 768, § 21, effective July 1; (7)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 921, § 7, effective July 1; (4)(c), (8), (9), (10)(c), and (14) amended, p. 1398, § 42, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(3.5) amended, p. 1085, § 2, effective July 1; (7)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 621, § 15, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(18) amended, p. 1709, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(18)(a) amended and (19) added, p. 721, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(10)(a)(II), (10)(b), and (13.5)(h)(II) amended, p. 286, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(3)(b)(III) amended, p. 1011, § 15, effective July 1; (10)(a)(II)(B), (10)(a)(II)(C), and (10)(a)(II)(D) amended, p. 1264, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5), (10)(a)(II)(A), (13.5)(h)(II), and (19) amended, p. 385, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1.6) amended, p. 80, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

IP(1.6) amended, p. 516, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended with relocated provisions, p. 73, § 1, effective March 16; (16)(d.5) added, p. 178, § 7, effective March 22; (13)(a)(IV), (13)(a)(V), (15)(b)(IV), and (15)(b)(V) added and IP(15)(b) amended, p. 1649, §§ 5, 3, effective May 31; (6)(b)(I) and (10)(a) amended, p. 1651, § 7, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2008:

(4)(b) and (5)(b)(I) amended, p. 1347, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5)(a)(I)(H) amended, (SB 09-282), ch. 288, p. 1397, § 59, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2013:

(5)(a)(I)(D), (5)(a)(I)(O), (5)(a)(I)(W), (6)(b)(I), (7)(a)(II)(B), (7)(a)(II)(C), (7)(a)(II)(D), and (16) amended, (5)(a)(II)(E) and (11)(d) added, and (7)(b) R&RE, (HB 13-1209), ch. 103, pp. 327, 332, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(16)(d) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1961, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 2016:

(6), (8)(e), (10)(g), and (14)(a) amended, (HB 16-1165), ch. 157, pp. 493, 494, 495, §§ 4, 5, 6, 7, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2017:

(3)(f) and (3)(g) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1391, § 29, effective May 25; (10)(h)(II) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1295, § 113, effective May 25; (16)(a) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 520, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(3)(a), IP(5)(a)(I), and (5)(a)(I)(Y) amended and (5)(a)(I.5) added, (HB 18-1385), ch. 251, p. 1546, § 2, effective August 8; (16)(c) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 400, § 14, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(5)(b)(I) and (5)(b)(III) amended and (5)(b)(I.5) and (5)(b.5) added, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2521, § 1, effective July 1; (16)(a) amended, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2552, § 2, effective July 1; (3)(c.5) and (8)(g) added and (6)(b), (7)(a)(II)(B), (7)(a)(II)(C), (7)(a)(II)(D), (7)(b), IP(11)(a), (11)(a)(I), and (11)(c) amended, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2521, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(6)(b), (7)(a)(II)(C), (7)(a)(II)(D), and (7)(b) amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(16)(c) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 21, § 24, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

(1) This section was amended in Senate Bill 07-015, resulting in the relocation of provisions. For a detailed comparison of relocated provisions, see the table located in the back of the index.

(2) Subsection (16.5)(d.5) was originally numbered as subsection (18)(a.5), and the amendments to it in Senate Bill 07-076 were harmonized with Senate Bill 07-015 and renumbered as subsection (16)(d.5).

Cross references:

(1) For provisions concerning deductions for health insurance from wages due an obligor ordered to provide health insurance, see § 14-14-112.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (3)(b)(III), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the act amending subsection (18)(a), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending subsections (1.5), (3.5), (7)(b), and (18)(a) and enacting subsections (1.6) and (1.7), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

(3) For the "Old-age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance Act", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 401 et seq.